Utah statutes.
78B-4-101.   Definitions.
As used in this part:
(1)  "Damage or injury" includes physical, nonphysical, economic, and
noneconomic damage.
(2)  "Financially secure source of recovery" means that, at the time of the
incident, a nonprofit organization:
(a)  has an insurance policy in effect that covers the activities of the
volunteer and has an insurance limit of not less than the limits established
under the Governmental Immunity Act of Utah in Section 63G-7-604; or
(b)  has established a qualified trust with a value not less than the combined
limits for property damage and single occurrence liability established under
the Governmental Immunity Act of Utah in Section 63G-7-604.
(3)  "Nonprofit organization" means any organization, other than a public
entity, described in Section 501 (c) of the Internal Revenue Code of 1986 and
exempt from tax under Section 501 (a) of that code.
(4)  "Public entity" has the same meaning as defined in Section 63G-8-102.
(5)  "Qualified trust" means a trust held for the purpose of compensating
claims for damages or injury in a trust company licensed to do business in
this state under the provisions of Title 7, Chapter 5, Trust Business.
(6)  "Reimbursements" means, with respect to each nonprofit organization:
(a)  compensation or honoraria totaling less than $300 per calendar year; and
(b)  payment of expenses actually incurred.
(7) (a)  "Volunteer" means an individual performing services for a nonprofit
organization who does not receive anything of value from that nonprofit
organization for those services except reimbursements.
(b)  "Volunteer" includes a volunteer serving as a director, officer, trustee,
or direct service volunteer.
(c)  "Volunteer" does not include an individual performing services for a
public entity to the extent the services are within the scope of Title 63G,
Chapter 8, Immunity for Persons Performing Voluntary Services or Title 67,
Chapter 20, Volunteer Government Workers Act.
